ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="aut/o__n">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ům</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ě</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ech</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>em</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="písmen/o__n">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ům</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>(o)</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ě</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>(o)</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>em</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="caj/k__n">
      <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ků</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kům</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kách</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cích</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kem</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="heli/um__n">
      <e><p><l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="výjim/ka__n">
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kem</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kám</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ko</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kách</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kou</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kami</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="analgeti/kum__n">
      <e><p><l>kum</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>k</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kům</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kum</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kum</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kách</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cích</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kem</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>kum<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="analgetikum"><i>analgeti</i><par n="analgeti/kum__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auto"><i>aut</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dynamo"><i>dynam</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="esperanto"><i>esperant</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helium"><i>heli</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hovado"><i>hovad</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hélium"><i>héli</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="místo"><i>míst</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="město"><i>měst</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olovo"><i>olov</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="písmeno"><i>písmen</i><par n="písmen/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slovo"><i>slov</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="výjimka"><i>výjim</i><par n="výjim/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zlato"><i>zlat</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="železo"><i>želez</i><par n="aut/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cajk"><i>caj</i><par n="caj/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vercajk"><i>vercaj</i><par n="caj/k__n"/></e>
